Hawaii statutes.
§467-13 Delivery of agreement. When a
licensee prepares or has prepared an agreement authorizing the licensee to
perform any of the acts for which the licensee is required to hold a license,
or when such licensee secures the signature of any party or parties to any
contract pertaining to such services or transaction, the licensee shall deliver
a copy of the agreement or contract to the party or parties signing it, at the
time the signature is obtained; provided that only one copy need be delivered
to parties signing as cotenants. [L 1957, c 112, §1; Supp, §170-11.5; HRS
§467-13; am L 1977, c 197, §1(4); gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next